District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.10

Rules with respect to gifts, procurement of goods and services, property disposition, conflict of interest.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 11, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(d), 45 DCR 5187
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.10.